Connecticut, session 2026, HB05557.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) The Commissioner of
Developmental Services shall produce a plan with recommendations on
developing a standard definition of intellectual disability that originates
before an individual attains eighteen years of age and is characterized
by significant limitations in both intellectual functioning and adaptive
behavior, including, but not limited to, conceptual, social and practical
skills. Such definition shall be consistent with generally accepted
professional standards, including, but not limited to, such standards
recognized by the American Association on Intellectual and
Developmental Disabilities.
(b) As part of the plan, the commissioner shall ensure (1) no single
test score or single measure would be determinative of intellectual
disability in any such definition; and (2) that such definition is based on
the totality of relevant clinical, educational and functional evidence,
including, but not limited to (A) standardized assessments when valid
and appropriate, (B) adaptive behavior measures, (C) developmental

House Bill No. 5557
history, (D) medical evidence, and (E) other reliable information.
(c) The commissioner shall include in the plan (1) a recommendation
for a timeline for the transition to a new definition of intellectual
disability, (2) any approvals required from the federal government, and
(3) estimates of the one-time costs of making such transition and the
recurring costs of utilizing the new definition to the Department of
Developmental Services, other state agencies and school districts
impacted by the change in the definition.
(d) Not later than July 1, 2027, the commissioner shall file a report on
the plan to provide recommendations on developing a standard
definition of intellectual disability, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a of the general statutes, with the joint standing committees
of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
appropriations and the budgets of state agencies, human services and
public health.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) The Commissioner of
Education shall establish an American Sign Language education
working group which shall consist of:
(1) (A) One representative each from the (i) Departments of
Education and Aging and Disability Services, (ii) Labor Department,
and (iii) Office of Higher Education, and (B) the following members
appointed by the Commissioner of Education: (i) A representative of the
Connecticut Council of Language Teachers, (ii) a representative of the
American School for the Deaf, (iii) a representative of the Connecticut
Association of the Deaf, and (iv) at least one American Sign Language
instructor who teaches in a public school in the state;
(2) One appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives;
(3) One appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate;
Public Act No. 26-151 2 of 5

House Bill No. 5557
(4) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(5) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate;
(6) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(7) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate;
(8) The House and Senate chairpersons and House and Senate
ranking members of the joint standing committees of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to education and
human services, or their designees; and
(9) Two persons appointed by the Governor.
(b) The working group shall provide recommendations to the
Department of Education regarding the following:
(1) Curriculum guidance for American Sign Language instruction
that includes, but is not limited to, aligning such curriculum with
nationally recognized proficiency frameworks;
(2) Teacher certification standards based on standards established by
the American Sign Language Teachers Association and the American
Sign Language Proficiency Interview that includes, but is not limited to,
(A) establishment of a proficiency benchmark, (B) recognition of an
alternative certification pathway for native American Sign Language
users and interpreters, and (C) reciprocity with American Sign
Language teaching certifications from other states; and
(3) Guidance to educator preparation programs in the state
concerning, but not limited to, the (A) expansion of American Sign
Language and interpretation education programs, (B) creation of
educational incentives, such as tuition support, credit enhancement or
Public Act No. 26-151 3 of 5

House Bill No. 5557
alternative programs, and (C) establishment of bridge, endorsement or
alternative programs for native American Sign Language users and
certified interpreters seeking teacher certification.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the
Department of Education shall submit a progress report, in accordance
with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint
standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to education and human services concerning the work
of the American Sign Language education working group.
Sec. 3. (Effective from passage) (a) The Commissioner of Social Services
shall conduct a study relating to Medicaid reimbursement rates for, and
the availability of, nonemergency medical transportation services for
Medicaid beneficiaries to (1) evaluate the adequacy of current Medicaid
reimbursement rates for nonemergency medical transportation services;
(2) examine the availability of such transportation services across the
state, including, but not limited to, geographic disparities in access and
service gaps; (3) evaluate options for permitting home care providers,
including, but not limited to, home health aides, to provide
transportation services to or from medical appointments for Medicaid
beneficiaries; (4) assess appropriate qualifications, licensing
requirements and insurance standards for any such home care
providers providing transportation services; (5) review the practices of
other states concerning reimbursement rates and provider eligibility for
nonemergency medical transportation services; and (6) identify any
other issues the commissioner deems relevant to improving access to
non-emergency medical transportation services for Medicaid
beneficiaries.
(b) Not later than February 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Social
Services shall submit a report on the findings of such study, and any
recommendations for legislation, to the joint standing committees of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to human
Public Act No. 26-151 4 of 5

House Bill No. 5557
services and public health, in accordance with the provisions of section
11-4a of the general statutes.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 2, 2026
Public Act No. 26-151 5 of 5